West Virginia, session 2025, HB3272.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3A. REMEDIES FOR WRONGFUL OCCUPATION OF RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY. §55-3A-1. Petition for summary relief for wrongful occupation of residential rental property. (a) A person desiring to remove a tenant from residential rental property may apply for such relief to the magistrate court or the circuit court of the county in which such the property is located, by verified petition, setting forth the following:(1) That he or she is the owner or agent of the owner and as such has a right to recover possession of the property;(2) A brief description of the property sufficient to identify it;(3) That the tenant is wrongfully occupying such property in that the tenant is in arrears in the payment of rent, has breached a warranty or a leasehold covenant, or has deliberately or negligently damaged the property or knowingly permitted another person to do so, and describing such arrearage, breach, or act or omission; and(4) A prayer for possession of the property.(b) Previous to the filing of the petition the person shall request from the court the time and place at which the petitioner shall be heard. The Upon filing the petition, the court shall fix a time for such schedule a hearing, which time shall may  not be less than five nor more than 10 judicial days following such request the filing of the petition.(c) Immediately upon being apprised of the time and place for hearing the petitioner shall cause a notice of the same hearing to be served upon the tenant in accordance with the provisions of Rule 4 of the West Virginia rules of civil procedure or by certified mail, return receipt requested. Such The notice shall inform the tenant that any defense to the petition must shall be submitted in writing to the petitioner within five days of the receipt by the tenant of the notice, and in no case later than the fifth day next preceding the date of hearing. Upon receipt of the return of service or the return receipt as the case may be, evidencing service upon the tenant, the petitioner shall file with the court his or her petition and such proof of service. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home